Utah statutes.
53-10-604.   Committee expenses -- Tax Commission expenses -- Division of Finance responsibilities.

(1)  Committee expenses and the costs of administering grants from the restricted account, as provided in Subsection (3), shall be paid from the restricted account.

(2) (a)  The expenses and costs of the State Tax Commission to administer and enforce the collection of the telephone levy imposed by Section 69-2-5.6 shall be paid from the restricted account.

(b) (i)  The State Tax Commission may charge the restricted account the administrative costs incurred in discharging the responsibilities imposed by Section 69-2-5.6.

(ii)  The charges in Subsection (2)(b)(i) may not exceed an amount equal to 1.5% of the charges imposed under Section 69-2-5.6.

(3) (a)  The Division of Finance shall be responsible for the care, custody, safekeeping, collection, and accounting for grants issued by the committee under the provisions of Section 53-10-605.

(b)  The Division of Finance may charge the restricted account the administrative costs incurred in discharging the responsibilities imposed by Subsection (3)(a).

